test/src/morphology/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - bitjes: # OAMES and GIMES, LEXATTR 
    bitjes+A+Attr: [bitjes, bihtja] 
    bitjes+A+Sg+Nom: bitjes
    bitjes+A+Sg+Gen: [bihtjasa, bihtjása]
    bitjes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bihtjasabbo, bihtjásabbo]
    bitjes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [bihtjasamos, bihtjásamos]
    bitjes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [bihtjasappot, bihtjásappot]
    bitjes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [bihtjasabmusit, bihtjásabmusit]
    bitjes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [bihtjasappusj, bihtjásappusj]
    bitjes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [bihtjasapputjit, bihtjásapputjit]
    bitjes+A+Der/at+Adv: [bihtjasit, bihtjásit]
    bitjes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [bihtjavuohta, bitjesvuohta]

  Adjective - vigák: # BASSTEL
    vigák+A+Attr: vigágis 
    vigák+A+Sg+Nom: vigák 
    vigák+A+Sg+Com: vigágijn 
    vigák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vigágabbo
    vigák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vigágamos
    vigák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: vigágappusj
    vigák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: vigágapputjit
    vigák+A+Der/at+Adv: vigágit
    vigák+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: vigágisvuohta

  Adjective - roahkok: # BASSTEL
    roahkok+A+Attr: roahkogis 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Nom: roahkok 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Ine: roahkogin 
    roahkok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: roahkogabbo
    roahkok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: roahkogamos
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: roahkogappot
    roahkok+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: roahkogabmusit
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: roahkogappusj
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: roahkogapputjit
    roahkok+A+Der/at+Adv: roahkogit
    roahkok+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: roahkogisvuohta

  Adjective - låssåk: # BASSTEL
    låssåk+A+Attr: låssågis 
    låssåk+A+Sg+Nom: låssåk 
    låssåk+A+Sg+Ine: låssågin 
    låssåk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: låssågabbo
    låssåk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: låssågamos
    låssåk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: låssågappot
    låssåk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: låssågabmusit
    låssåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: låssågappusj
    låssåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: låssågapputjit
    låssåk+A+Der/at+Adv: låssågit
    låssåk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: låssågisvuohta

  Adjective - gæhppat: # BASSTEL
    gæhppat+A+Attr: gæhppadis 
    gæhppat+A+Sg+Nom: gæhppat 
    gæhppat+A+Sg+Ine: gæhppadin 
    gæhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gæhppadabbo
    gæhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gæhppadamos
    gæhppat+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gæhppadappot
    gæhppat+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gæhppadabmusit
    gæhppat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gæhppadappusj
    gæhppat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gæhppadapputjit
    gæhppat+A+Der/at+Adv: gæhppadit
    gæhppat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gæhppadisvuohta

  Adjective - gålisj: # BASSTEL
    gålisj+A+Attr: gålitjis 
    gålisj+A+Sg+Nom: gålisj 
    gålisj+A+Sg+Ine: gålitjin 
    gålisj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gålitjabbo
    gålisj+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gålitjamos
    gålisj+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gålitjappot
    gålisj+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gålitjabmusit
    gålisj+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gålitjappusj
    gålisj+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gålitjapputjit
    gålisj+A+Der/at+Adv: gålitjit
    gålisj+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gålitjisvuohta

  Adjective - giddis: # BASSTEL
    giddis+A+Attr: giddisis 
    giddis+A+Sg+Nom: giddis 
    giddis+A+Sg+Ine: giddisin 
    giddis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: giddisabbo
    giddis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: giddisamos
    giddis+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: giddisappot
    giddis+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: giddisabmusit
    giddis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: giddisappusj
    giddis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: giddisapputjit
    giddis+A+Der/at+Adv: giddisit
    giddis+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: giddisisvuohta

  Adjective - gavvar: # BASSTEL
    gavvar+A+Attr: gavvaris 
    gavvar+A+Sg+Nom: gavvar 
    gavvar+A+Sg+Ine: gavvarin 
    gavvar+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gavvarabbo
    gavvar+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gavvaramos
    gavvar+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gavvarappot
    gavvar+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gavvarabmusit
    gavvar+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gavvarappusj
    gavvar+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gavvarapputjit
    gavvar+A+Der/at+Adv: gavvarit
    gavvar+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gavvarisvuohta

  Adjective - dågun: # BASSTEL
    dågun+A+Attr: dågunis 
    dågun+A+Sg+Nom: dågun 
    dågun+A+Sg+Ine: dågunin 
    dågun+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dågunabbo
    dågun+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dågunamos
    dågun+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: dågunappot
    dågun+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: dågunabmusit
    dågun+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: dågunappusj
    dågun+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: dågunapputjit
    dågun+A+Der/at+Adv: dågunit
    dågun+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dågunisvuohta

  Adjective - bargál: # BASSTEL
    bargál+A+Attr: bargális 
    bargál+A+Sg+Nom: bargál 
    bargál+A+Sg+Ine: bargálin 
    bargál+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: bargálabbo
    bargál+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bargálamos
    bargál+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: bargálappot
    bargál+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: bargálabmusit
    bargál+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: bargálappusj
    bargál+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: bargálapputjit
    bargál+A+Der/at+Adv: bargálit
    bargál+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: bargálisvuohta

  Adjective - dabár: # DABÁR
    dabár+A+Attr: dabáris 
    dabár+A+Sg+Nom: dabár 
    dabár+A+Sg+Gen: dahpara 
    dabár+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dahparabbo
    dabár+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dahparamos
    dabár+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: dahparappusj
    dabár+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: dahparapputjit
    dabár+A+Der/at+Adv: dahparit
    dabár+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dabárisvuohta

  Adjective - girjak: # MUTTÁK give both -k and -gis attr
    girjak+A+Attr: [girjak, girjagis]
    girjak+A+Sg+Nom: girjak 
    girjak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: girjagabbo
    girjak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: girjagamos
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: girjagappot
    girjak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: girjagabmusit
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: girjagappusj
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: girjagapputjit
    girjak+A+Der/at+Adv: girjagit
    girjak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: girjakvuohta

  Adjective - árvas: # MUTTÁK give both -k and -gis attr
    árvas+A+Attr: [árvas, árvasis]
    árvas+A+Sg+Nom: árvas 
    árvas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: árvasabbo
    árvas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: árvasamos
    árvas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: árvasappot
    árvas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: árvasabmusit
    árvas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: árvasappusj
    árvas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: árvasapputjit
    árvas+A+Der/at+Adv: árvasit
    árvas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: árvasvuohta

  Adjective - skárbak: # SKÁRBAK
    skárbak+A+Attr: skárbbis
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: skárbak
    skárbak+A+Sg+Acc: skárbagav
    skárbak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: skárbagabbo
    skárbak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: skárbagamos
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: skárbagappot
    skárbak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: skárbagabmusit
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: skárbagappusj
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: skárbagapputjit
    skárbak+A+Der/at+Adv: skárbagit
    skárbak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: skárbbisvuohta

  Adjective - gassak: # ALLAK  even syll comp
    gassak+A+Attr: gassa 
    gassak+A+Sg+Nom: gassak 
    gassak+A+Sg+Gen: gassaga 
    gassak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gasep, gassagabbo]
    gassak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gasemus, gassagamos]
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [gasebut, gassagappot]
    gassak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [gasemusát, gassagabmusit]
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [gasebusj, gassagappusj]
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [gasebuttjat, gassagapputjit]
    gassak+A+Der/at+Adv: gassagit
    gassak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta

  Adjective - allak: # ALLAK
    allak+A+Attr: alla 
    allak+A+Sg+Nom: allak 
    allak+A+Sg+Acc: allagav 
    allak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [alep, allagabbo]
    allak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [alemus, allagamos]
    allak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [alebut, allagappot]
    allak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [alemusát, allagabmusit]
    allak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [alebusj, allagappusj]
    allak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [alebuttjat, allagapputjit]
    allak+A+Der/at+Adv: allagit
    allak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: allavuohta

  Adjective - gåbddåk: # GÅBDDÅK Even syll comp
    gåbddåk+A+Attr: gåbddå 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom: gåbddåk 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc: gåbddågav 
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gåbdep
    gåbddåk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gåbdemus
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [gåbdebut, gåbddågappot]
    gåbddåk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [gåbdemusát, gåbddågabmusit]
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gåbdebusj
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gåbdebuttjat
    gåbddåk+A+Der/at+Adv: gåbddågit
    gåbddåk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gåbddåvuohta

  Adjective - stuorak: # STUORAK
    stuorak+A+Attr: [stuor, stuorra] 
    stuorak+A+Sg+Nom: stuorak 
    stuorak+A+Sg+Acc: stuoragav 
    stuorak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stuoráp
    stuorak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stuorámus
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: stuorábut
    stuorak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: stuorámusát
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: stuorábusj
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: stuorábuttjat
    stuorak+A+Der/at+Adv: stuoragit
    stuorak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: stuorravuohta

  Adjective - måjdås: # RIHTSOK and LEXATTR
    måjdås+A+Attr: []
    måjdås+A+Sg+Nom: måjdås 
    måjdås+A+Sg+Com: måjddåsijn 
    måjdås+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: måjddåsabbo
    måjdås+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: måjddåsamos
    måjdås+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: måjddåsappot
    måjdås+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: måjddåsabmusit
    måjdås+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: måjddåsappusj
    måjdås+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: måjddåsapputjit
    måjdås+A+Der/at+Adv: måjddåsit
    måjdås+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - rihtsok: # RIHTSOK and LEXATTR
    rihtsok+A+Attr: rihtso 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsok 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Com: rihtsogijn 
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rihtsogabbo
    rihtsok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rihtsogamos
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogappot
    rihtsok+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogabmusit
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: rihtsogappusj
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogapputjit
    rihtsok+A+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogit
    rihtsok+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: rihtsovuohta

  Adjective - gårrat: # RIHTSOK and LEXATTR
    gårrat+A+Attr: goarris 
    gårrat+A+Sg+Nom: gårrat 
    gårrat+A+Sg+Com: gårradijn 
    gårrat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gårradabbo
    gårrat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gårradamos
    gårrat+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gårradappot
    gårrat+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gårradabmusit
    gårrat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gårradappusj
    gårrat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gårradapputjit
    gårrat+A+Der/at+Adv: gårradit
    gårrat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: goarrisvuohta

  Adjective - smávuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    smávuk+A+Attr: []
    smávuk+A+Sg+Nom: smávuk 
    smávuk+A+Sg+Gen: smávuga 
    smávuk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: smávugabbo
    smávuk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: smávugamos
    smávuk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: smávugappot
    smávuk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: smávugabmusit
    smávuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: smávugappusj
    smávuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: smávugapputjit
    smávuk+A+Der/at+Adv: smávugit
    smávuk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gasuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    gasuk+A+Attr: gassa
    gasuk+A+Sg+Nom: gasuk 
    gasuk+A+Sg+Gen: gasuga 
    gasuk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gasugabbo
    gasuk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gasugamos
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gasugappot
    gasuk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gasugabmusit
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gasugappusj
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gasugapputjit
    gasuk+A+Der/at+Adv: gasugit
    gasuk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta

  Adjective - gutjel: # SJÆVNNJAT and LExattr
    gutjel+A+Attr: gutjelis
    gutjel+A+Sg+Nom: gutjel
    gutjel+A+Sg+Gen: guhtjála
    gutjel+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: guhtjálabbo
    gutjel+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: guhtjálamos
    gutjel+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: guhtjálappot
    gutjel+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: guhtjálabmusit
    gutjel+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: guhtjálappusj
    gutjel+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: guhtjálapputjit
    gutjel+A+Der/at+Adv: guhtjálit
    gutjel+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gutjelisvuohta
